Hawaii statutes.
[PART
VIII.] INTERISLAND TRANSMISSION SYSTEM

[§269-131]
Definitions. As used in this part:

"Cable acquisition cost" means the
electric utility company's costs, including reasonable transaction costs, to
acquire a high-voltage electric transmission cable system pursuant to a turnkey
cable contract or a cable purchase contract.

"Cable company" means any person or
persons, company, corporation, or entity that is selected through a request for
proposals, or other process approved by the commission, to be a certified cable
company applicant.

"Certified cable company" means any
person or persons, company, corporation, or entity who owns or controls a high-voltage
electric transmission cable system and who receives a certificate of public
convenience and necessity from the commission pursuant to section 269-132.

"Commercial operations" means the
period after the high-voltage electric transmission cable system:

(1) Passes acceptance tests approved by the
commission, as determined by a qualified independent engineer approved by the
commission; and

(2) Meets other criteria the commission determines to
be reasonable.

"Commercial operations date" means
the date upon which the high-voltage electric transmission cable system begins
commercial operations, as determined by the commission.

"Commission" means the public
utilities commission.

"Cost-effective" has the same meaning
as in section 269-91.

"Electric utility company" means a
public utility as defined in section 269-1, for the production, conveyance,
transmission, delivery, or furnishing of electric power.

"Electric utility system" means the
electric system owned and operated by an electric utility company, including
any non-utility owned facilities that are interconnected to the system,
consisting of power plants, transmission and distribution lines, and related
equipment for the production and delivery of electric power to the public.

"Energy resources coordinator" or "coordinator"
means the director of business, economic development, and tourism.

"High-voltage electric transmission cable
system" means one hundred twenty kilovolts or greater of alternating
current or direct current transmission cables constructed undersea, including
connected transmission cables or lines installed on land that connect the
electric utility systems on two or more islands or allow for the transmission
of power from one or more energy generation facilities to the electric utility
system located on another island of the State; alternating current substation
or alternating current-direct current converter station; on-island transmission
infrastructure if required; fiber optic communication cables; and other
appurtenant facilities.

"On-island transmission infrastructure"
means the modifications and additions to the existing alternating current
transmission grid on an island and other electric utility system modifications
needed to reliably connect a high-voltage electric transmission cable system to
an electric utility system, and to reliably accept power transmitted via the high-voltage
electric transmission cable system connecting two or more islands of the State's
electric utility systems.

"Power purchase agreement" means an
agreement between an electric utility company and the developer of an energy
generation facility to sell the power generated by the facility to the electric
utility company.

"Project-on-project
financing risk" means the risk involved when mutually dependent projects,
whose risk of completion, and therefore, financing, are dependent on each
other.

"Renewable electricity" means
electrical energy generated using renewable energy as the source.

"Renewable energy" has the same
meaning as in section 269-91.

"Renewable energy generation facility"
means a facility generating electrical energy using renewable energy as the
primary source.

"Renewable portfolio standard" has
the same meaning as in section 269-91.

"Request for proposals" means a
request for proposals issued pursuant to a competitive process authorized,
reviewed, and approved by the commission, and developed and conducted by the
electric utility company or companies to which the capacity of a high-voltage
electric transmission cable system will be made available, with input and
assistance from the state energy resources coordinator, to select a cable
company. [L 2012, c 165, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next